Georgia, session 2025_26, HB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
provisions of insurance, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"33-1-28.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no insurer shall increase
liability insurance rates.
(b) This Code section is repealed on January 1, 2031."
H. B. 345
- 1 -

LC 46 1075
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2026, and shall apply to all policies, contracts,
and certificates executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state
on and after said date.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 345
- 2 -